District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.64

Repealed

Deposit of money with Mayor — Limits on application.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 137, ch. 222, § 64
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-464.
1973 Ed., § 40-480.